Washington statutes.
RCW 32.12.025

Withdrawals by savings bank's drafts in accordance with depositor's instructions authorized.

Subject to the provisions of RCW 32.12.020(1), a savings bank may, on instructions from a depositor, effect withdrawals from a savings account by the savings bank's drafts payable to parties and on terms as so instructed; to the extent of the subjection of accounts to such withdrawal instruction, such accounts may be specifically classified under RCW 32.12.090(2) and ineligible to receive interest or eligible only for limited interest.

[ 1967 c 145 s 3.]